test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_piehain_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - piehâin: # ok
    piehâin+v1+N+Sg+Nom: piehâin 
    piehâin+v1+N+Sg+Gen: piehâin
    piehâin+v1+N+Sg+Acc: piehâin
    piehâin+v1+N+Sg+Ill: piehânjân
    piehâin+v1+N+Sg+Loc: piehânjist
    piehâin+v1+N+Sg+Com: piehânjáin
    piehâin+v1+N+Sg+Abe: piehâinttáá
    piehâin+v1+N+Ess: piehânjin
    piehâin+v1+N+Par: piehânjid
    piehâin+v1+N+Pl+Nom: piehânjeh
    piehâin+v1+N+Pl+Gen: piehânjij
    piehâin+v1+N+Pl+Acc: piehânjijd
    piehâin+v1+N+Pl+Ill: piehânjáid
    piehâin+v1+N+Pl+Loc: piehânjijn
    piehâin+v1+N+Pl+Com: [piehânjijguin, piehânjijgijn]
    piehâin+v1+N+Pl+Abe: piehânjijttáá

#  Noun - kahhaan: # ok
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Sg+Nom: kahhaan 
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Sg+Gen: kahhaan
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Sg+Acc: kahhaan
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Sg+Ill: kahanjân
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Sg+Loc: kahanjist
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Sg+Com: kahanjáin
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Sg+Abe: kahhaanttáá
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Ess: kahanjin
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Par: kahanjid
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Pl+Nom: kahanjeh
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Pl+Gen: kahanjij
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Pl+Acc: kahanjijd
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Pl+Ill: kahanjáid
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Pl+Loc: kahanjijn
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Pl+Com: [kahanjijguin, kahanjijgijn]
#    kahhaan+v1+N+Pl+Abe: kahanjijttáá


#  Noun - kahhaanj: # ok
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Sg+Nom: kahhaanj 
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Sg+Gen: kahhaanj
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Sg+Acc: kahhaanj
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Sg+Ill: kahanjân
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Sg+Loc: kahanjist
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Sg+Com: kahanjáin
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Sg+Abe: kahhaanttáá
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Ess: kahanjin
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Par: kahanjid
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Pl+Nom: kahanjeh
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Pl+Gen: kahanjij
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Pl+Acc: kahanjijd
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Pl+Ill: kahanjáid
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Pl+Loc: kahanjijn
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Pl+Com: [kahanjijguin, kahanjijgijn]
#    kahhaan+v2+N+Pl+Abe: kahanjijttáá
#


  Noun - vuolâin: # ok
    vuolâin+v1+N+Sg+Nom: vuolâin
    vuolâin+v1+N+Sg+Gen: vuolâin
    vuolâin+v1+N+Sg+Acc: vuolâin
    vuolâin+v1+N+Sg+Ill: vuolânjân
    vuolâin+v1+N+Sg+Loc: vuolânjist
    vuolâin+v1+N+Sg+Com: vuolânjáin
    vuolâin+v1+N+Sg+Abe: vuolâinttáá
    vuolâin+v1+N+Ess: vuolânjin
    vuolâin+v1+N+Par: vuolânjid
    vuolâin+v1+N+Pl+Nom: vuolânjeh
    vuolâin+v1+N+Pl+Gen: vuolânjij
    vuolâin+v1+N+Pl+Acc: vuolânjijd
    vuolâin+v1+N+Pl+Ill: vuolânjáid
    vuolâin+v1+N+Pl+Loc: vuolânjijn
    vuolâin+v1+N+Pl+Com: [vuolânjijguin, vuolânjijgijn]
    vuolâin+v1+N+Pl+Abe: vuolânjijttáá

  Noun - suoppâin: # ok
    suoppâin+v1+N+Sg+Nom: suoppâin
    suoppâin+v1+N+Sg+Gen: suoppâin
    suoppâin+v1+N+Sg+Acc: suoppâin
    suoppâin+v1+N+Sg+Ill: suopânjân
    suoppâin+v1+N+Sg+Loc: suopânjist
    suoppâin+v1+N+Sg+Com: suopânjáin
    suoppâin+v1+N+Sg+Abe: suoppâinttáá
    suoppâin+v1+N+Ess: suopânjin
    suoppâin+v1+N+Par: suopânjid
    suoppâin+v1+N+Pl+Nom: suopânjeh
    suoppâin+v1+N+Pl+Gen: suopânjij
    suoppâin+v1+N+Pl+Acc: suopânjijd
    suoppâin+v1+N+Pl+Ill: suopânjáid
    suoppâin+v1+N+Pl+Loc: suopânjijn
    suoppâin+v1+N+Pl+Com: [suopânjijguin, suopânjijgijn]
    suoppâin+v1+N+Pl+Abe: suopânjijttáá

  Noun - kooppâin: # ok
    kooppâin+v1+N+Sg+Nom: kooppâin
    kooppâin+v1+N+Sg+Gen: kooppâin
    kooppâin+v1+N+Sg+Acc: kooppâin
    kooppâin+v1+N+Sg+Ill: kopânjân
    kooppâin+v1+N+Sg+Loc: kopânjist
    kooppâin+v1+N+Sg+Com: kopânjáin
    kooppâin+v1+N+Sg+Abe: kooppâinttáá
    kooppâin+v1+N+Ess: kopânjin
    kooppâin+v1+N+Par: kopânjid
    kooppâin+v1+N+Pl+Nom: kopânjeh
    kooppâin+v1+N+Pl+Gen: kopânjij
    kooppâin+v1+N+Pl+Acc: kopânjijd
    kooppâin+v1+N+Pl+Ill: kopânjáid
    kooppâin+v1+N+Pl+Loc: kopânjijn
    kooppâin+v1+N+Pl+Com: [kopânjijguin, kopânjijgijn]
    kooppâin+v1+N+Pl+Abe: kopânjijttáá

  Noun - kiäruin: # ok 
    kiäruin+v1+N+Sg+Nom: kiäruin
    kiäruin+v1+N+Sg+Gen: kiäruin
    kiäruin+v1+N+Sg+Acc: kiäruin
    kiäruin+v1+N+Sg+Ill: kiärunjân
    kiäruin+v1+N+Sg+Loc: kiärunjist
    kiäruin+v1+N+Sg+Com: kiärunjáin
    kiäruin+v1+N+Sg+Abe: kiäruinttáá
    kiäruin+v1+N+Ess: kiärunjin
    kiäruin+v1+N+Par: kiärunjid
    kiäruin+v1+N+Pl+Nom: kiärunjeh
    kiäruin+v1+N+Pl+Gen: kiärunjij
    kiäruin+v1+N+Pl+Acc: kiärunjijd
    kiäruin+v1+N+Pl+Ill: kiärunjáid
    kiäruin+v1+N+Pl+Loc: kiärunjijn
    kiäruin+v1+N+Pl+Com: [kiärunjijguin, kiärunjijgijn]
    kiäruin+v1+N+Pl+Abe: kiärunjijttáá

  Noun - piehânj: # ok
    piehâin+v2+N+Sg+Nom: piehânj
    piehâin+v2+N+Sg+Gen: piehânj
    piehâin+v2+N+Sg+Acc: piehânj
    piehâin+v2+N+Sg+Ill: piehânjân
    piehâin+v2+N+Sg+Loc: piehânjist
    piehâin+v2+N+Sg+Com: piehânjáin
    piehâin+v2+N+Sg+Abe: piehâinttáá
    piehâin+v2+N+Ess: piehânjin
    piehâin+v2+N+Par: piehânjid
    piehâin+v2+N+Pl+Nom: piehânjeh
    piehâin+v2+N+Pl+Gen: piehânjij
    piehâin+v2+N+Pl+Acc: piehânjijd
    piehâin+v2+N+Pl+Ill: piehânjáid
    piehâin+v2+N+Pl+Loc: piehânjijn
    piehâin+v2+N+Pl+Com: [piehânjijguin, piehânjijgijn]
    piehâin+v2+N+Pl+Abe: piehânjijttáá
  

  Noun - vuolânj: # ok
    vuolâin+v2+N+Sg+Nom: vuolânj
    vuolâin+v2+N+Sg+Gen: vuolânj
    vuolâin+v2+N+Sg+Acc: vuolânj
    vuolâin+v2+N+Sg+Ill: vuolânjân
    vuolâin+v2+N+Sg+Loc: vuolânjist
    vuolâin+v2+N+Sg+Com: vuolânjáin
    vuolâin+v2+N+Sg+Abe: vuolâinttáá
    vuolâin+v2+N+Ess: vuolânjin
    vuolâin+v2+N+Par: vuolânjid
    vuolâin+v2+N+Pl+Nom: vuolânjeh
    vuolâin+v2+N+Pl+Gen: vuolânjij
    vuolâin+v2+N+Pl+Acc: vuolânjijd
    vuolâin+v2+N+Pl+Ill: vuolânjáid
    vuolâin+v2+N+Pl+Loc: vuolânjijn
    vuolâin+v2+N+Pl+Com: [vuolânjijguin, vuolânjijgijn]
    vuolâin+v2+N+Pl+Abe: vuolânjijttáá
    
  Noun - suoppânj: # ok
    suoppâin+v2+N+Sg+Nom: suoppânj
    suoppâin+v2+N+Sg+Gen: suoppânj
    suoppâin+v2+N+Sg+Acc: suoppânj
    suoppâin+v2+N+Sg+Ill: suopânjân
    suoppâin+v2+N+Sg+Loc: suopânjist
    suoppâin+v2+N+Sg+Com: suopânjáin
    suoppâin+v2+N+Sg+Abe: suoppâinttáá
    suoppâin+v2+N+Ess: suopânjin
    suoppâin+v2+N+Par: suopânjid
    suoppâin+v2+N+Pl+Nom: suopânjeh
    suoppâin+v2+N+Pl+Gen: suopânjij
    suoppâin+v2+N+Pl+Acc: suopânjijd
    suoppâin+v2+N+Pl+Ill: suopânjáid
    suoppâin+v2+N+Pl+Loc: suopânjijn
    suoppâin+v2+N+Pl+Com: [suopânjijguin, suopânjijgijn]
    suoppâin+v2+N+Pl+Abe: suopânjijttáá

  Noun - kiäruin: # ok
    kiäruin+v2+N+Sg+Nom: kiärunj 
    kiäruin+v2+N+Sg+Gen: kiärunj
    kiäruin+v2+N+Sg+Acc: kiärunj
    kiäruin+v2+N+Sg+Ill: kiärunjân
    kiäruin+v2+N+Sg+Loc: kiärunjist
    kiäruin+v2+N+Sg+Com: kiärunjáin
    kiäruin+v2+N+Sg+Abe: kiäruinttáá
    kiäruin+v2+N+Ess: kiärunjin
    kiäruin+v2+N+Par: kiärunjid
    kiäruin+v2+N+Pl+Nom: kiärunjeh
    kiäruin+v2+N+Pl+Gen: kiärunjij
    kiäruin+v2+N+Pl+Acc: kiärunjijd
    kiäruin+v2+N+Pl+Ill: kiärunjáid
    kiäruin+v2+N+Pl+Loc: kiärunjijn
    kiäruin+v2+N+Pl+Com: [kiärunjijguin, kiärunjijgijn]
    kiäruin+v2+N+Pl+Abe: kiärunjijttáá

        # MLO sárnum kiärunjijn Matti Morottajain. Täst ennuv variaatio. Väljejum kyehti sujâttemtiijpâ: -in: nj já -nj, mii siäilu. 
    
